src/kn.dic
ಅಕ್ಕಪಕ್ಕದವ/11,12
ಅತ್ಯಾಸೆ/93
ಅತ್ರಿ/31
ಅಥಣಿ/33
ಅದು/1001,1008
ಅದ್ಭುತ/13
ಅಧಿಕಾರಿಣಿ/32
ಅನಾಥ/11
ಅನಾಥೆ/92
ಅನ್ಯಗ್ರಹ/13
ಅಪ್ಸರೆ/92
ಅಭಿಮಾನಿ/31
ಅಭಿವೃದ್ಧಿ/33
ಅಮಾಯಕಿ/32
ಅಮೂಲ್ಯ/13
ಅಮೆರಿಕಾ/23
ಅಮ್ಮ/11
ಅರ್ಪಿಸು/6001
ಅಲ್ಲಿ/1003
ಅವ/11,12
ಅವಲಂಬನೆ/93
ಅವಳಿ/31
ಅವುಗಳ/1000,1001,1002
ಅಳುಕು/53
ಅಂಕ/13
ಅಂಕೆ/93
ಅಂಕೋಲಾ/23
ಅಂಗಜ/11
ಅಂಗಡಿಯಾಕೆ/92
ಅಂಗನೆ/92
ಅಂಗೈ/113
ಅಂಜನಾ/22
ಅಂಜಲಿ/32
ಅಂಟಾರ್ಟಿಕಾ/23
ಅಂಟಿಸು/6001
ಅಂತಹವ/11,12
ಅಂದ/13
ಅಂಧ/11,12
ಅಂಬಾಲಿಕಾ/22
ಅಂಬಿಕಾ/22
ಅಂಬಿಗ/11
ಅಂಬೆ/92
ಆಕಾಂಕ್ಷಿ/31
ಆಕೃತಿ/33
ಆಕೆ/92
ಆಗ್ರಾ/23
ಆಚರಣೆ/93
ಆಚರಿಸು/6001
ಆಚಾರ್ಯರು/14
ಆನಂದಬಾಷ್ಪ/53
ಆಪ್ತೆ/92
ಆಯುಕ್ತ/11
ಆಯೋಜಕಿ/32
ಆರೋಗ್ಯಕರ/13
ಆಲೋಚನೆ/93
ಆಶಿಸು/6001
ಆಸಕ್ತಿ/33
ಇತರ/11,12
ಇದು/1001,1008
ಇಬ್ಬರು/14
ಇವ/11,12
ಇವರೀರ್ವರು/14
ಇಳಿಜಾರು/53
ಇಂತಹವ/11,12
ಈಟಿ/33
ಈರ್ವರು/14
ಈಶ್ವರ/11
ಉಗ್ರ/171
ಉಗ್ರಗಾಮಿ/31
ಉಗ್ರಾಣ/13
ಉತ್ತರಿಸು/6001
ಉದಾಹರಣೆ/93
ಉದ್ಯೋಗಸ್ಥೆ/92
ಉಪಕುಲಪತಿ/31
ಉಪಾಧ್ಯಾಯಿನಿ/32
ಉಪ್ಪು/53
ಉಷ್ಣಾಂಶ/13
ಉಂಟಾಗು/6001
ಋಷಿ/31
ಎಡಗೈ/113
ಎಡವಟ್ಟು/33
ಎಲುಬು/53
ಎಲೆ/93
ಎಲ್ಲರು/14
ಏರ್ಪಡು/6001
ಐದು/53
ಐಶ್ವರ್ಯಾ/22
ಒಳ್ಳೆಯವ/11,12
ಒಂದೆರಡು/53
ಓಡಾಡು/6001
ಓಣಿ/33
ಓಲೆ/93
ಔಷಧೀಯ/13
ಕಡಲು/53
ಕಡ್ಡಾಯಗೊಳಿಸು/6001
ಕಥೆಗಾರ/11
ಕಥೆಗಾರ್ತಿ/32
ಕದಂಬರು/14
ಕನಸು/53
ಕನ್ಯೆ/92
ಕರಡಿ/33
ಕರಾಳತೆ/93
ಕರ್ತೃ/71
ಕಲಾ/22
ಕಲಾಪ/13
ಕಲಾವಿದೆ/92
ಕಳೆ/6002
ಕಾಣೆಯಾಗು/6001
ಕಾನೂನು/53
ಕಾಮುಕ/11
ಕಾರ್ಯಕರ್ತೆ/92
ಕಾರ್ಯದರ್ಶಿ/31
ಕಾಲ್ಪನಿಕ/13
ಕಾವಲಿ/33
ಕಾಳು/53
ಕಿರಿದಾಗು/6001
ಕಿರಿಯ/11
ಕಿರುತೆರೆ/93
ಕುಮಟಾ/23
ಕುರಿ/33
ಕುರುಡಿ/32
ಕುಲಪತಿ/31
ಕುಸಿ/6002
ಕೂದಲು/53
ಕೂಸು/52
ಕೃಷಿಕ/11
ಕೃಷ್ಣಾ/22
ಕೆಟ್ಟವ/11,12
ಕೆಲವರು/14
ಕೇರಳ/13
ಕೈ/113
ಕೈಗಾರಿಕಾ/23
ಕೊರತೆ/93
ಕೊರಳು/53
ಕೊಳ್ಳಿ/33
ಕೋಮುವಾದಿ/31
ಕೋರು/6001
ಕಂಬಳಿ/33
ಕ್ರಮ/13
ಕ್ರಿಸ್ತ/11
ಕ್ರೂರ/12
ಖೀರು/53
ಗಜಗಮನೆ/92
ಗಜಗಾಮಿನಿ/32
ಗಣಪತಿ/31
ಗಣಿ/33
ಗಣಿಗಾರಿಕೆ/93
ಗಲ್ಲ/13
ಗಾಯಕಿ/32
ಗಿಳಿ/33
ಗುಣಾಢ್ಯ/11
ಗುರು/53
ಗುಳಿ/33
ಗೂಳಿ/31
ಗೃಹಸ್ಥೆ/92
ಗೆಲ್ಲು/6001
ಗೆಳತಿ/32
ಗೊಜ್ಜು/53
ಗೋವಾ/23
ಗೌತಮ/11
ಗಂಗಾ/22
ಗಂಭೀರ/13
ಗ್ರಹಿಕೆ/93
ಚಕೋರಿ/32
ಚಕ್ರವರ್ತಿ/31
ಚಟ್ನಿ/33
ಚತುರ/12
ಚಹಾ/23
ಚಾಟಿ/33
ಚಾಲಕ/11
ಚಿಕಿತ್ಸೆ/93
ಚಿನ್ನ/13
ಚಿಪ್ಪು/53
ಚೆಲ್ಲು/6001
ಚಂದ್ರ/11
ಜನನಿ/32
ಜನಬಳಕೆ/93
ಜನರ/1000,1001,1002
ಜನರು/14
ಜನವರಿ/33
ಜನಾಂಗದವ/11,12
ಜಮದಗ್ನಿ/31
ಜಾಗ/13
ಜಾಣ/11
ಜಾಣೆ/92
ಜಾನುವಾರು/53
ಜಿಲ್ಲೆಯವ/11,12
ಜ್ಯಾ/23
ಜ್ಯೋತಿ/33,32
ಠಾಣಾಧಿಕಾರಿ/31
ಠಾಣೆ/93
ತಕರಾರು/53
ತಜ್ಞೆ/92
ತಡೆ/113
ತನುಜಾತೆ/92
ತಪ್ಪಿತಸ್ಥೆ/12
ತಪ್ಪಿತಸ್ಥೆ/92
ತಬ್ಬಲಿ/31
ತಯಾರಿಸು/6001
ತವರೂರು/53
ತಳಿ/33
ತಾತ್ಕಾಲಿಕ/13
ತಾಯಿ/32
ತಿರುಮಲ/11,13
ತಿಲೋತ್ತಮೆ/92
ತೀರ್ಪು/53
ತೀವ್ರತೆ/93
ತುಂಗಭದ್ರಾ/22
ತುಂಗಾ/22
ತುಂಗೆ/92
ತುಂಟಿ/32
ತುಂಬು/6001
ತೂಗುಗತ್ತಿ/33
ತೆಗೆ/6002
ತೆರವು/53
ತೊಡು/6001
ತೊಳೆ/6002
ತಂತ್ರಾಂಶ/13
ತಂಪು/53
ದಡ್ಡಿ/32
ದಲಿತೆ/92
ದಶಕೋಟಿ/33
ದಸರಾ/23
ದಿಟ್ಟಿಸು/6001
ದಿನಪತ್ರಿಕೆ/93
ದಿನಾಂಕ/13
ದೀಪಾ/22
ದುಬಾರಿ/33
ದುರಹಂಕಾರಿ/31
ದೇವರು/14
ದೊಡ್ಡಮ್ಮ/11
ದೋಣಿ/33
ದಂತ/13
ಧಕ್ಕೆ/93
ಧಿಮಾಕು/53
ನಟಿ/32
ನಡೆಯಲಾರಂಭಿಸು/6001
ನಮಸ್ಕಾರ/13
ನರ್ಮದಾ/22
ನಲ್ಲೆ/92
ನವಿಲು/53
ನಾಗರಿಕ/11
ನಾರಿ/32
ನಾಳೆ/93
ನಿಯಮ/13
ನಿರತ/11,12
ನಿರಪರಾಧಿ/31
ನಿರೀಕ್ಷಿಸು/6001
ನಿರ್ಜೀವಿ/33
ನಿರ್ದೇಶಕ/11
ನಿರ್ದೇಶಕಿ/32
ನಿವೇದಿತಾ/22
ನಿಷೇಧಿಸು/6001
ನೀರಾ/23
ನೂಲು/53
ನೆನೆ/7001
ನೆರೆಹೊರೆಯವ/11,12
ನೇತ್ರಾವತಿ/32
ನೇಸರ/11
ನೊರೆ/93
ನಂತರ/13
ನ್ಯಾಯವಾದಿ/31
ಪಕ್ಕದಲ್ಲಿದ್ದವ/11,12
ಪಕ್ಕೆಲುಬು/53
ಪಡೆ/6001
ಪತ್ರಕರ್ತೆ/92
ಪದಾಧಿಕಾರಿ/31
ಪರಿ/33
ಪರಿಣತೆ/92
ಪರಿಸರ/13
ಪವನಜ/11
ಪಾತಕಿ/31
ಪಾತ್ರೆ/93
ಪಾರ್ಲಿಮೆಂಟು/53
ಪಾರ್ವತಿ/32
ಪಿತೃ/71
ಪುಢಾರಿ/31
ಪುಣ್ಯ/13
ಪುಣ್ಯವಂತೆ/92
ಪುರೋಹಿತ/11
ಪುಸಲಾಯಿಸು/6001
ಪೂಜಾ/22
ಪೆದ್ದಿ/32
ಪೊರೆ/6002
ಪಂಚಾಯ್ತಿ/33
ಪ್ರಖ್ಯಾತ/11
ಪ್ರತಿಜ್ಞೆ/93
ಪ್ರತಿಭಾ/22
ಪ್ರತಿವಾದ/13
ಪ್ರತಿವಾದಿ/31
ಪ್ರತಿವಂದನೆ/92
ಪ್ರದರ್ಶಿಸು/6001
ಪ್ರಧಾನಮಂತ್ರಿ/31
ಪ್ರಹಸನ/13
ಪ್ರಾಧ್ಯಾಪಕ/11
ಪ್ರಾಯೋಜಕಿ/32
ಪ್ರಿಯತಮೆ/92
ಪ್ರೇಕ್ಷಕ/11,12
ಪ್ರೇಮಿ/31
ಫಲಕಾರಿಯಾಗು/6001
ಬಡವಿ/32
ಬರಹಗಾರ/11
ಬರೆ/6002
ಬಲಗೈ/113
ಬಲಿ/33
ಬಳಕೆ/93
ಬಳಸು/53,6001
ಬಾಪೂಜಿ/31
ಬಾಲಕಿ/32
ಬಿಡಿಸು/6001
ಬುನಾದಿ/33
ಬುರ್ಖಾ/23
ಬೆನ್ನು/53
ಬೆಳೆ/6002
ಬೆಳೆ/93,6002
ಬೊಬ್ಬಿಡು/6001
ಬೋಧಕ/11
ಬ್ರಹ್ಮಚಾರಿ/31
ಬ್ರಿಟಿಷ/11,12
ಭಡ್ತಿ/32
ಭದ್ರಾ/22
ಭಯ/13
ಭಾಗವತ/11
ಭಾಗ್ಯವಂತೆ/92
ಭೀಮ/11
ಭೂಮಿ/32
ಭೂಮಿ/33
ಭ್ರಮೆ/93
ಭ್ರಷ್ಟೆ/92
ಮಕ್ಕಳ/1000,1001,1002
ಮಗಳು/52
ಮಚ್ಚು/53
ಮತ್ತೊಬ್ಬ/11,12
ಮಥುರಾ/23
ಮಧ್ವಾಚಾರ್ಯರು/14
ಮನುಷ್ಯ/11
ಮರೆಗುಳಿ/31
ಮಸಾಲೆ/93
ಮಹಾನಗರ/13
ಮಹಿಳಾ/22
ಮಹಿಳೆ/92
ಮಾಡಿದ/7001
ಮಾತೆ/92
ಮಾದಕವಸ್ತು/53
ಮಾನ್ಯತಾ/22
ಮಾರ್ಗದರ್ಶಿ/33
ಮಾಂಸಾಹಾರಿ/31
ಮಿಡಿ/33,6002
ಮುಖ್ಯರಸ್ತೆ/93
ಮುಖ್ಯೋಪಾಧ್ಯಾಯ/11
ಮುಖ್ಯೋಪಾಧ್ಯಾಯಿನಿ/32
ಮುಗಿಸು/6001
ಮುಗ್ಧೆ/92
ಮುರಿ/6002
ಮುಂಗೈ/113
ಮುಂಬೈ/113
ಮೂಕಾಂಬಿಕಾ/22
ಮೂಕಾಂಬಿಕೆ/92
ಮೂಡಲು/53
ಮೇನಕಾ/22
ಮೇಲುಗೈ/113
ಮೇಲ್ಮೈ/113
ಮೇಸ್ತ್ರಿ/31
ಮೈ/113
ಮೊಮ್ಮಗಳು/52
ಮೋಹ/13
ಮಂಡಳಿ/33
ಮಂತ್ರಾಕ್ಷತೆ/93
ಯಜುರ್ವೇದಿ/31
ಯಮುನಾ/22
ಯಾರು/14
ಯಾವುದು/1001,1008
ಯುವಕ/11
ಯುವತಿ/32
ರಕ್ತಸಂಬಂಧಿ/31
ರಫ್ತು/53
ರಮಾ/22
ರವಾನಿಸು/6001
ರಾಕ್ಷಸಿ/32
ರಾಜಕಾರಣಿ/31
ರಾಜ್ಯದವ/11,12
ರಾಜ್ಯಸಭಾ/23
ರಾಜ್ಯಾಧ್ಯಕ್ಷೆ/92
ರಾಷ್ಟ್ರಾಧ್ಯಕ್ಷ/11
ರುದ್ರಾಕ್ಷಿ/33
ರೂಪ/13
ರೋಗಿ/31
ರಂಗಸಜ್ಜಿಕೆ/93
ರಂಜನಾ/22
ರಂಭಾ/22
ಲೋಕಸಭಾ/23
ವಜಾ/23
ವಾದಕಿ/32
ವಾರ್ತಾ/22
ವಾಸ/13
ವಾಸ್ತು/53
ವಿಖ್ಯಾತಿ/33
ವಿಚಾರಧಾರೆ/93
ವಿಜೇತೆ/92
ವಿಧಾನಸಭಾ/23
ವಿನಯ/11,13
ವಿಮರ್ಶಕಿ/32
ವಿಷಯಾಧಾರ/13
ವಿಂಗಡಿಸು/6001
ವೀಳ್ಯದೆಲೆ/93
ವೃತ್ತಿಪರ/11,12
ವೃದ್ಧೆ/92
ವೆಂಕಟೇಶ/11
ವೇಗಿ/31
ಶರಾವತಿ/32
ಶಾಸ್ತ್ರಿ/31
ಶಿಕ್ಷಕಿ/32
ಶಿರಡಿ/33
ಶಿಲ್ಪ/13
ಶೇಕಡಾ/23
ಶಂಕರಾಚಾರ್ಯರು/14
ಶ್ಯಾಮ/11
ಶ್ರೀಮಂತಿಕೆ/93
ಶ್ರೀಮಂತೆ/92
ಶ್ರುತಿ/32,33
ಸತ್ತವ/11,12
ಸಮುದಾಯದವ/11,12
ಸಮಂಜಸ/13
ಸಮ್ಮತಿ/33
ಸರಸ್ವತಿ/32
ಸರಿ/6002
ಸರ್ವಕಾಲೀನ/11
ಸಹನಾ/22
ಸಾಧನೆ/93
ಸಾಮ್ರಾಜ್ಞಿ/32
ಸಾರಥಿ/31
ಸಾರ್ವಜನಿಕರು/14
ಸಿಗರೇಟು/53
ಸಿನಿಮಾ/23
ಸಿಹಿ/33
ಸೀತಾ/22
ಸೀಮಾ/22
ಸುಡು/6001
ಸುಧಾ/22
ಸುವರ್ಣ/13
ಸೆರೆ/93
ಸೆಳೆ/6002
ಸೇವಕಿ/32
ಸೊಕ್ಕು/53
ಸೊಸೆ/92
ಸಂಗಾತಿ/31
ಸಂದೀಪ/11
ಸಂಶೋಧನೆ/93
ಸ್ನೇಹಿತೆ/92
ಸ್ಫಟಿಕ/13
ಸ್ವಾಮಿ/31
ಸ್ವೀಕರಿಸು/6001
ಹನಿ/33
ಹರಿವು/53
ಹಿಡಿ/33,6002
ಹಿತ್ತಾಳೆ/93
ಹಿರಿಯ/11,12
ಹಿಂದುಳಿದವ/11,12
ಹುಚ್ಚು/53
ಹುಡುಗ/11
ಹುಡುಗಿ/32
ಹುಳ/13
ಹೆಣ್ಣು/52
ಹೆದ್ದಾರಿ/33
ಹೇರು/6001
ಹೇಸರಗತ್ತೆ/93
ಹಂಸಗಾಮಿನಿ/32
ಅಗಿ/6002
ಅಳೆ/6002
ಅಳು/6001
ಬಡಿ/6002
ಬಸಿ/6002
ಬಿರಿ/6002
ದುಡಿ/6002
ಎಳೆ/6002
ಗೆಲ್ಲು/6001
ಹಡೆ/6002
ಹರಿ/6002
ಹೊಡೆ/6002
ಹುಗಿ/6002
ಇರಿ/6002
ಜಿಗಿ/6002
ಕಾಯು/6001
ಕಡಿ/6002
ಕರಿ/6002
ಕುಡಿ/6002
ಮೆರೆ/6002
ಮುಗಿ/6002
ನಲಿ/6002
ನೋಯು/6001
ಒಡೆ/6002
ಪಡೆ/6002
ಸವೆ/6002
ಸುಳಿ/6002
ತಣಿ/6002
ತಿವಿ/6002
ತುರಿ/6002
ಉಬ್ಬು/6001
ನಿಂದ/7001
ನಲಿದ/7001
ಮಲಗಿದ/7001
ಕೂಗಿದ/7001
ಅಳೆದ/7001
ಉತ್ತ /7001
ಉಬ್ಬಿದ/7001
ತೊರೆದ/7001
ತಿಳಿದ/7001
ತಂದ/7001
ಬಿಟ್ಟ/7001
ಅಂದ/7001
ಹೆತ್ತ/7001
ಕಾದ/7001
ನೆಟ್ಟ/7001
ಅಳಿದ/7001
ಅಂಕುರಿಸಿದ/7001
ಬಯಸಿದ/7001
ಬೆಳೆದ/7001
ಚೆಲ್ಲಿದ/7001
ಎಳೆದ/7001
ಹಾಡಿದ/7001
ಹೇಳಿದ/7001
ಹೊಳೆದ/7001
ಹೊರಟ/7001
ಇಟ್ಟ/7001
ಕಾಡಿದ/7001
ಕಾಡಿದ/7001
ಕೊಟ್ಟ/7001
ಮಾಡಿದ/7001
ಮೊರೆದ/7001
ನೆಟ್ಟ/7001
ನೂಕಿದ/7001
ಸತ್ತ/7001
ಸಿಗಿದ/7001
ತಣಿದ/7001
ಆಗಿಸಿ/7002
ಅಗೆಸಿ/7002
ಅಳಿಸಿ/7002
ಅಂಕುರಿಸಿ/7002
ಅರೆಸಿ/7002
ಬಾಗಿಸಿ/7002
ಬರೆಸಿ/7002
ಬಸಿದು/7002
ಬೆಳೆಸಿ/7002
ಬಿರಿಸಿ/7002
ಎಡೆಸಿ/7002
ಗೆಲ್ಲಿಸಿ/7002
ಹಳಿಸಿ/7002
ಹೇರಿಸಿ/7002
ಹೋಗಿಸಿ/7002
ಹುರಿಸಿ/7002
ಜಗಿಸಿ/7002
ಕಾಯಿಸಿ/7002
ಕಳೆಸಿ/7002
ಕೆರೆಸಿ/7002
ಕೊಲ್ಲಿಸಿ/7002
ಕುಡಿಸಿ/7002
ಮಣಿಸಿ/7002
ಮೊರೆಸಿ/7002
ನಡೆಸಿ/7002
ನೇಯಿಸಿ/7002
ನೀಗಿಸಿ/7002
ಒಡೆಸಿ/7002
ಪಡೆಸಿ/7002
ಸಲ್ಲಿಸಿ/7002
ಸೇರಿಸಿ/7002
ಸೀಳಿಸಿ/7002
ತೆರೆಸಿ/7002
ತೇಯಿಸಿ/7002
ತಿಳಿಸಿ/7002
ತೋಡಿಸಿ/7002
ತುರಿಸಿ/7002
ಉರಿಸಿ/7002
